Utah statutes.
20A-9-803.   Declaration of candidacy -- Filing fee -- Form.
(1)  Candidates for President of the United States who are affiliated with a
registered political party in Utah that has elected to participate in Utah's
Western States Presidential Primary and who wish to participate in the primary
shall:
(a)  except as provided in Subsection (1)(b), file a declaration of candidacy,
in person or via a designated agent, with the lieutenant governor between July
1 of the year before the primary election will be held and 5 p.m. on October
15 of the year before the primary election will be held;
(b)  identify the registered political party whose nomination the candidate is
seeking;
(c)  provide a letter from the registered political party certifying that the
candidate may participate as a candidate for that party in that party's
presidential primary election; and
(d)  pay the filing fee of $500.
(2)  The lieutenant governor shall develop a declaration of candidacy form for
presidential candidates participating in the primary.
